Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 1 Proceedings in Family Court
14-1-36.1.
Release from training school.

No child sentenced to the training school for youth, after being found delinquent or wayward, shall be released prior to the end of his or her sentence unless authorized by a justice of the family court, after a hearing with due notice to the parties to the petition upon which the child was sentenced. At any such hearing, the family court shall authorize the release of the child to his or her home and/or to the care and custody of the department of children, youth and families unless the court finds that the child:

Poses a substantial risk of harm to self; or

Poses a substantial risk of harm to others; or

Has demonstrated that he or she may leave the jurisdiction of the court.

Provided, however, any child who has been certified and adjudicated pursuant to §§

14-1-7.2

and

14-1-7.3

, may not be released prior to the end of his or her sentence, except as authorized under §

14-1-42

of this chapter.

A child so sentenced may be allowed as part of a rehabilitation program to be placed temporarily in a community program outside of the training school only when authorized by the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 12, § 2.

14-1-36.2.
Assignment of custody to the director of the department of children, youth and families.

In the event the court assigns custody of a child to the director of the department of children, youth and families pursuant to §§

14-1-11

,

14-1-11.1

,

14-1-27

,

14-1-32

,

14-1-34

,

14-1-36

,

14-1-36.1

,

40-11-7.1

, or

40-11-12

, the court shall authorize the provision of suitable treatment, rehabilitation and care for each child in the least restrictive and community-based setting.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 10.

14-1-36.3.
Community confinement.

The family court may authorize that a sentenced youth or a youth who is subject to an order of detention to the Thomas C. Slater training school be placed in the community in an appropriate setting as specified in §§

14-1-27

and

14-1-32

for a period of time as determined by the court. In any instance wherein the family court authorizes the release of a sentenced youth from the Thomas C. Slater training school to community confinement, the youth shall be supervised by probation pursuant to §

14-1-33

and the term of community confinement shall not exceed the term of his or her sentence to the training school.

The court order to place a detained youth or a sentenced youth on probation and/or in community confinement may include the use of electronic surveillance or monitoring devices as defined in this chapter, upon the finding by the court that:

The youth is charged with or adjudicated on an offense which meets the definition of “delinquent” as found in

14-1-3(5)

; and

The youth would otherwise be detained at or sentenced to the Thomas C. Slater Training School for Youth; and

The use of the surveillance or devices will allow the youth to be released to the home of a legal guardian, family member, or foster home placement.

Any use of electronic surveillance and monitoring devices authorized for non-adjudicated youth who have been detained in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be limited to thirty (30) days unless the court determines that an additional period not to exceed thirty (30) days is necessary for the safety or welfare of the youth and/or the community.

Any use of electronic surveillance and monitoring devices authorized for adjudicated youth who have been sentenced in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be limited to a period not to exceed sixty (60) days unless the court determines that an additional period not to exceed thirty (30) days is necessary for the safety or welfare of the youth and/or the community.

The department is authorized to adopt, amend, and rescind regulations in accordance with this chapter and implement its provisions, including rules and regulations for the application, surveillance and reporting of youth compliance with electronic surveillance and monitoring devices. The regulations shall be promulgated and become effective in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 17, § 4.

14-1-37.
Other disposition for best interests of child.

The court may make any further disposition that it may deem to be for the best interests of the child, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-37

.

14-1-38.
Insufficient evidence of waywardness or delinquency.

If, after a hearing on any petition in the case of a wayward or delinquent child under this chapter, the court finds that there is not sufficient evidence to support it, the court shall adjudge the child to be not a delinquent or wayward child, as the case may be, and shall discharge the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-38

.

14-1-39.
Fees for delivery of child to court or institution.

A fee of one dollar ($1.00), and an allowance of ten cents ($0.10) per mile traveled with any child may be paid to the person designated to deliver any child to a public or private institution, agency, or society, or to bring any child from a public or private institution, agency, or society to a session of the court, the allowance to be paid out of a sum appropriated for this purpose, when certified to by a justice of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-39

.

14-1-40.
Adjudication not having effect of conviction.

No adjudication upon the status of any child in the jurisdiction of the court shall operate to impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily resulting from a conviction, nor shall any child be deemed a criminal by reason of that adjudication, nor shall that adjudication be deemed a conviction, nor shall any child be charged with or convicted of a crime in any court, except as provided in this chapter. The disposition of a child or any evidence given in the court shall not be admissible as evidence against the child in any case or proceeding in any other court, nor shall that disposition or evidence operate to disqualify a child in any future civil service application, examination, or appointment.

Any finding of delinquency based upon acts which would constitute a felony, if committed by an adult, shall be available to the attorney general for use in its recommendations to any court in sentencing and that record may be taken into consideration for the purposes of sentencing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-20

; P.L. 1985, ch. 349, § 1.

14-1-41.
Protection of religious faith.

In placing a child under the guardianship or custody of a private agency, society, or institution, the court may when practicable select an agency, society, or institution governed by persons of like religious faith of the parents of the child, or in case of a difference in the religious faith of the parents, then of the religious faith of the child, or, if the religious faith of the child is not ascertainable, then of the faith of either of the parents. When neither the religious faith of the parents nor the religious faith of the child is ascertainable, the foregoing principles shall not apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 26; P.L. 1946, ch. 1772, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-41

; P.L. 1977, ch. 83, § 1.

14-1-42.
Modification of order of commitment — Release, detention, or recommitment of child.

An order of commitment made by the court in the case of a child shall be subject to modification or revocation from time to time.

A parent, guardian, or next friend of a child or counsel for a child who has been committed or assigned by the court to the custody of the department of children, youth and families may at any time file with the court a verified petition, stating that the person or the department has denied an application for the release of the child or has failed to act upon the application within a reasonable time. If the court is of the opinion that an investigation should be had, it may, upon due notice to all concerned, proceed to hear and determine the question at issue. If a petition is filed, it shall be the duty of the court to determine by clear and convincing evidence that there has been a change of circumstances, and where the modification or revocation of the order of commitment is in the best interest of the child and the public, the court may:

Order that the child be restored to the custody of its parent or guardian or be detained in the custody of the person or the department;

Direct the person or the department to make any other arrangements for the child’s care and welfare that the circumstances of the case may require; or

A further order of commitment.

In any case where a child has been certified and adjudicated pursuant to §§

14-1-7.2

and

14-1-7.3

, and sentenced pursuant to §

14-1-7.3(a)(2)

, the court shall schedule a review of the child’s case thirty (30) days prior to the child’s eighteenth birthday or thirty (30) days prior to the one-year anniversary of the imposition of the sentence, whichever is greater. It shall be the responsibility of the attorney general or of the law enforcement agency making the arrest to notify the victim or victims of the crime for which the juvenile was certified and adjudicated of the pendency of the hearing and afford them the opportunity to be heard. The court shall not hear or determine any other motion for modification of the order of certification, except as provided for in this section. At that time and upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that demonstrates that the person has made sufficient efforts at rehabilitation and that the modification of the order of certification would not pose a threat to the safety of the public, the court may suspend, but shall not vacate, the balance of the sentence.

In the event that the court, after a hearing, determines that it has not been demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that the person has made sufficient efforts at rehabilitation and that the modification of the order of certification entered pursuant to §

14-1-7.3(a)(2)

would pose a threat to the safety of the public, the court shall order either:

That the person be remanded to the training school for youth until further hearing to be held no later than one year thereafter in accordance with subsection (c) of this section; or

That the jurisdiction of the sentence be transferred to the department of corrections and that the balance of the sentence be served in facilities under the control of the department.

In any case where a child has been certified and adjudicated pursuant to §

14-1-7.3(a)(2)

, upon motion by the attorney general and/or the department of children, youth and families, the court shall conduct a hearing to consider modification of the order of certification if the family court determines that the individual poses a serious threat to the safety of the public, other residents at the training school and/or training school staff. Upon that finding the court may order that the jurisdiction of the sentence be transferred to the department of corrections and that the balance of the sentence be served in facilities under the control of the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-42

; P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 24.

14-1-43.
Repealed.

14-1-44.
Effect of order for maintenance — Enforcement.

The order and decree shall be regarded as a judgment for debt on which suits may be brought or executions may issue for amounts due and unpaid, from time to time, to be shown by affidavits of the custodian of the child entitled to those amounts and the attorney of record, if any, of the custodian, the executions to run against the goods and chattels of the parent, and for want of goods and chattels against the body of the parent. The law officer of any town or city or the state attorney-general of the state may enter appearance for the purpose of obtaining or enforcing any order and decree for support in the case of a child in which the town, city, or state is an interested party.

The court shall have any and all of the powers of a court of equity for the purpose of enforcing any of these orders and decrees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-44

.

14-1-45.
Procedures in adult cases — Sentence.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, all provisions of this chapter relative to procedure in cases of children, so far as practicable, shall also be construed as applying to cases against adults for offenses committed against state laws within the purview of this chapter. Upon trial of those cases, the court shall have the power to impose the sentence that the law provides, suspend the sentence, place on probation, revoke or continue suspension, or by order impose upon the adult any duty that shall be deemed for the best interests of the child, and exercise any additional powers over the defendant that is exercised by the superior court in other criminal cases under the provisions of chapter 19 of title 12.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-45

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 6; P.L. 1961, ch. 81, § 1.

14-1-45.1.
Compelling evidence in adult cases — Immunity.

In the hearing of any case in which an adult is charged with an offense committed against state laws within the purview of this chapter, if a person refuses to answer a question or produce other evidence of any kind on the ground that he or she may be incriminated by it, or if a child refuses to answer a question or produce other evidence of any kind on the ground that it supports a finding that he or she is delinquent or wayward, and if the attorney general, in writing, requests the chief judge of the family court or his or her designee to order that person or child to answer the question or produce the evidence, the court, in its discretion, after notice to the witness, may order the person or child to answer the question or produce the evidence. In deciding those matters, the chief judge or his or her designee shall consider whether the person may be incriminated or whether the evidence may support a finding that the child is delinquent or wayward in some other jurisdiction. After complying, and if, but for this section, he or she would have been privileged to withhold the answer given or the evidence produced by him or her, that person or child shall not be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which, in accordance with the order, he or she gave answer or produced evidence. But he or she may, nevertheless, be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering or failing to answer, or in producing, or failing to produce, evidence in accordance with the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 217, § 2.

14-1-46.
Institution of proceedings against adults — Process.

Proceedings against adults may be instituted by the officers duly authorized by law to institute those proceedings or by the court’s own motion. The court shall issue its summons, warrant of arrest, or other process in order to secure or compel the attendance of any necessary person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-46

.

14-1-47.
Trial by judge or jury.

If any adult is charged with an offense, the trial shall be by jury unless the accused shall in open court expressly waive trial by jury and request to be tried by the justice, in which case the trial shall be by the justice of the family court, and the judgment and sentence shall have the same force and effect in all respects as if the judgment and sentence had been entered and pronounced upon the verdict of a jury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-47

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-48.
Jury trial in family court.

In every case in which trial is by jury in the family court, in accordance with the provisions of §

14-1-47

, the trial shall be held in the same manner and subject to the same provisions as jury trials in criminal prosecution in the superior court.

The presiding justice of the superior court may assign a room in the superior court building for any jury trial held by the family court. The general public shall be excluded and only those persons shall be admitted as provided in §

14-1-30

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-48

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 6; P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 1.

14-1-48.1.
Powers of chief judge in jury trials.

The chief judge of the family court, in the selection of petit jurors for family court service, shall be empowered to exercise all powers which the presiding judge of the superior court has in the selection of petit jurors in criminal cases to be tried before the superior court. All agencies of state government shall provide the necessary services as requested by the chief judge of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 71, § 4.

14-1-49.
Fees for service of process or attendance in court.

In proceedings under this chapter, no court or witness fees shall be taxed or allowed against any party to a petition, and no salaried officer of the state, or of any city or town, shall be entitled to receive any fee for the service of process or for attendance in court in any of these proceedings, but all other persons acting under orders of the court shall be allowed, for service of process and attendance in court, the fees provided by law for like services in criminal cases before the district court, the fees to be paid from the appropriation provided for by law, when certified to by a justice of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-49

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-50.
[Obsolete.]

14-1-51.
Physical or mental examination and treatment.

The court may cause any person coming under its jurisdiction to be examined by a licensed physician who is expert in physical diagnosis or in neuropsychiatry.

Whenever a child who has been brought before the family court appears to be in need of medical or surgical care, the court may order the parent, guardian, or other custodian to provide treatment for the child in a hospital or otherwise. If the parent, guardian or other custodian fails to provide that care, the court may, after due notice, enter an order for it; and the expense of the medical care when approved by the court shall be charged to the state, if the parents are unable to pay it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-51

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-52.
Appeals.

From any final decree, judgment, order, decision, or verdict of the family court, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, there shall be an appeal to the supreme court, which appeal, in all civil cases except paternity proceedings under chapter 8 of title 15, shall follow the procedure for appeal in civil actions as provided in chapter 24 of title 9. A decision granting a divorce shall be appealable upon entry and, except as otherwise provided by law, the correctness of the decision shall not be reviewable upon an appeal from a final decree for divorce entered in pursuance of §

15-5-23

. Appeals in criminal cases in which the family court exercises jurisdiction over adults, and in paternity cases under chapter 8 of title 15, shall follow the procedure for appeal as provided in chapter 24 of title 9. The provisions of chapter 24 of title 9 and applicable procedural rules relating to the superior court shall apply to the family court in matters appealed from the family court; provided, that on appeal, the supreme court may by rule provide for certain circumstances as it may deem appropriate.

Every person aggrieved by any decree, judgment, order, decision, or verdict of the family court relating to modification of alimony or of child support, or a finding of contempt for failure to pay alimony or child support, may, within twenty (20) days after entry of the decree, judgment, order, decision, or verdict, seek review of questions of law in the supreme court by petition for writ of certiorari in accordance with the procedure contained in this chapter. The petition for a writ of certiorari shall set forth errors claimed. Upon the filing of a petition with the clerk of the supreme court, the supreme court may, if it sees fit, issue its writ of certiorari to the family court to certify to the supreme court the record of the proceeding under review, or so much of it as was submitted to the family court by the parties, together with any additional record of the proceeding in the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-52

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 6; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 59; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 28; P.L. 1981, ch. 329, § 1.

14-1-53.
Effect of pendency of appeal.

The pendency of an appeal in the case of a child shall not suspend the order or decree of the family court, nor shall it discharge the child from the custody of the court or of the person, institution, or agency to whose care the child shall have been committed, unless by writ of habeas corpus unless and until the supreme court or any justice of the supreme court shall so order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-53

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 6.

14-1-54 — 14-1-57.
Repealed.

14-1-58.
Counsel.

The attorney general or any attorney in his or her department designated by him or her shall, upon request of the petitioner, when directed by the court, appear and act for the petitioner in any criminal case under the provisions of this chapter; and the public defender shall, at the direction of the court, appear in criminal cases on behalf of defendants who are found by the court to be financially unable to engage counsel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-58

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 6.

14-1-59.
Cooperation of public and private agencies.

It is made the duty of every state, town, or municipal official or department, including, but not limited to, the department of children, youth, and families, the department of health, the department of human services, the department of elementary and secondary education, the office of substance abuse, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, to render all assistance and cooperation within his, her, or its jurisdictional power which may further the objects of this chapter. All institutions or agencies providing services to any child are required to give to the court any information concerning the child that the court may require. The court is authorized to seek the cooperation of all societies or organizations having for their object the protection or aid of children, and their physical or spiritual welfare; and the court shall utilize the available services of all of those societies and organizations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-59

; P.L. 1992, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2.

14-1-59.1.
Procedural safeguards.

The family court, in cooperation with the department of children, youth, and families, shall develop policies for the purpose of identifying procedural safeguards to protect the rights of children in the process of discharge or emancipation and/or disposition of a petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 274, § 2.

14-1-60.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 115, § 7; P.L. 1897, ch. 475, § 4; P.L. 1908, ch. 1540, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 139, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 142, § 7; P.L. 1926, ch. 844, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 425, § 4; P.L. 1950, ch. 2416, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-60

; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 1, effective June 30, 2017.

14-1-61.
Rules of court.

The court shall have the power to adopt rules of procedure for the conduct of the court not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-61

.

14-1-62.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes sought in it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-62

.

14-1-63.
[Obsolete.]

14-1-64.
Disposition of juvenile records.

All police records relating to the arrest, detention, apprehension, and disposition of any juveniles shall be kept in files separate and apart from the arrest records of adults and shall be withheld from public inspection, but the police report relating to the arrest or detention of a juvenile shall be open to inspection and copying upon request and upon payment of copying costs in accordance with §

38-2-4

by the parent, guardian, or attorney of the juvenile involved. After disposition of an offense and upon execution of an appropriate release and upon payment of copying costs in accordance with §

38-2-4

by the parent, guardian or attorney of the juvenile involved, records relating to the arrest, detention, apprehension and disposition of the juveniles shall be open to inspection and copying by the parent, guardian, or attorney of the juvenile involved.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the identity of any juvenile waived pursuant to §

14-1-7.1

or certified and convicted pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

shall be made public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 70, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 187, § 1.

14-1-65.
Hearings for out-of-state placement of children.

Prior to authorizing the placement of a child entrusted to the control of the department of children, youth, and families and in an out-of-state child caring facility, other than the home of a relative, the department shall petition the family court for a placement hearing. The family court shall grant approval for the placement if the following facts are found:

That no suitable in-state facilities are available for the placement of the child;

That the child will receive an individualized treatment plan, including, but not limited to, appropriate clinical treatment, education, training, and rehabilitation; and

That the proposed placement is in the best interest of the child.

This section shall not apply when the proposed placement is less than thirty-five (35) miles from the home of the parent previously having custody of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 74, § 1.

14-1-66.
Application by victim to obtain name of juvenile.

Upon written motion by the victim of a crime or his or her attorney, the family court may, in its discretion, and upon good cause shown, divulge the name and address of the juvenile accused of committing the crime solely for the purpose of allowing the victim to commence a civil action against the juvenile and/or his or her parents to recover for damages sustained as a result of the crime; provided, that written notice of the motion shall be given to the juvenile accused of committing the crime or his or her attorney, and further provided that the court shall order that the name and address of the juvenile accused of committing the crime not be divulged by the victim of a crime or his or her attorney to any other person unless and until the civil action is commenced, without further order of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 317, § 1.

14-1-67.
Revocation or denial of motor vehicle operator’s license upon finding of delinquency or waywardness.

If the court finds that a child is delinquent, by reason of having violated any provision of chapter 28 of title 21 or is wayward in accordance with §

14-1-3(11)(i)

— (11)(v), the court, in addition to any other penalty or punishment imposed, may prepare and send to the division of motor vehicles, within twenty-four (24) hours of the determination of delinquency or waywardness, an order of denial or an order of revocation of the driving privileges of the child found delinquent or wayward and/or may require the child to perform up to one hundred (100) hours of community restitution.

The court may review the order and may withdraw the order at any time the court deems appropriate, except the court may not withdraw an order for a period of ninety (90) days following issuance of the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 171, § 1.

14-1-67.1.
Revocation of motor vehicle operator’s license for failure to make restitution.

If a child fails to make court ordered restitution within the time period provided for in an order of the court, a judge may prepare and send to the division of motor vehicles an order of revocation of the driving privileges of the child. The judge may order the revocation to be in effect until the child complies with the order to make restitution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 350, § 2.

14-1-68.
Child witness.

A videotape recording made by the department of children, youth, and families, a law enforcement officer, or a hospital, of an interview of or statement made by a child who is the subject of any petition filed by the department pursuant to §§

40-11-7

,

14-1-11

, and/or

15-7-7

, is admissible in any court proceeding under those sections notwithstanding any objection to hearsay statements contained in the videotape, provided it is relevant and material, and provided its probative value substantially outweighs the danger of unfair prejudice to the child’s parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the child’s welfare. The circumstances of the making of the videotape recording, including the maker’s lack of personal knowledge, may be proved to affect its weight.

Prior to the videotaped recording being introduced into evidence the court shall first determine that:

The statement is sworn to under oath by the child and the significance of the oath is explained to the child;

The recording is both visual and aural, and is recorded on film or videotaped or by other electronic means;

The recording equipment was capable of making an accurate recording, the operator of the equipment was competent, and the recording is accurate and has not been altered;

Every voice on the recording is identified;

The statement was not made in response to questioning calculated to lead the child to make a particular statement;

The person conducting the interview of the child is available to testify at any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter; and

The child shall be available to testify at any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 379, § 1.

14-1-69.
Hearsay.

In any custody and/or termination trial and/or a hearing on a motion or probable cause hearing where a petition has been filed by the department of children, youth, and families in accordance with §§

14-1-11

,

40-11-7

and/or

15-7-7

in the family court, the court may, in its discretion, permit as evidence any statement by a child under the age of thirteen (13) years old about a prescribed act of abuse, neglect, or misconduct by a parent or guardian, if that statement was made spontaneously within a reasonable time after the act is alleged to have occurred, and if the statement was made to someone the child would normally turn to for sympathy, protection, or advice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 303, § 1.

14-1-70.
Proceedings under prior law.

No proceeding arising from an offense committed prior to April 11, 1990, shall be affected by the repeal or modification of the statutes in effect at the time an offense was committed, but proceedings may be instituted, continued, and brought to final determination in accord with the laws and regulations in effect prior to April 11, 1990.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2.

14-1-71.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2.